motorola-external-hunspell/motorola/external/hunspell/dicts/it_IT/it_IT.aff
PFX $ Y 62 # gestione dei numeri romani 2#2
PFX $ 0 x [cl]
PFX $ 0 l x
PFX $ 0 c [xlcdm]
PFX $ 0 cx [lc]
PFX $ 0 cl x
PFX $ 0 cc [xlc]
PFX $ 0 ccx [lc]
PFX $ 0 ccl x
PFX $ 0 ccc [xl]
PFX $ 0 cccx [lc]
PFX $ 0 cccl x
PFX $ 0 cd [xl]
PFX $ 0 cdx [lc]
PFX $ 0 cdl x
PFX $ 0 d [xlc]
PFX $ 0 dx [lc]
PFX $ 0 dl x
PFX $ 0 dc [xlc]
PFX $ 0 dcx [lc]
PFX $ 0 dcl x
PFX $ 0 dcc [xlc]
PFX $ 0 dccx [lc]
PFX $ 0 dccl x
PFX $ 0 dccc [xl]
PFX $ 0 dcccx [lc]
PFX $ 0 dcccl x
PFX $ 0 cm [xl]
PFX $ 0 cmx [lc]
PFX $ 0 cml x
PFX $ 0 m [xlcdm]
PFX $ 0 mx [lc]
PFX $ 0 ml x
PFX $ 0 mc [xlcmd]
PFX $ 0 mcx [lc]
PFX $ 0 mcl x
PFX $ 0 mcc [xlc]
PFX $ 0 mccx [lc]
PFX $ 0 mccl x
PFX $ 0 mccc [xl]
PFX $ 0 mcccx [lc]
PFX $ 0 mcccl x
PFX $ 0 mcd [xl]
PFX $ 0 mcdx [lc]
PFX $ 0 mcdl x
PFX $ 0 md [xlc]
PFX $ 0 mdx [lc]
PFX $ 0 mdl x
PFX $ 0 mdc [xlc]
PFX $ 0 mdcx [lc]
PFX $ 0 mdcl x
PFX $ 0 mdcc [xlc]
PFX $ 0 mdccx [lc]
PFX $ 0 mdccl x
PFX $ 0 mdccc [xl]
PFX $ 0 mdcccx [lc]
PFX $ 0 mdcccl x
PFX $ 0 mcm [xl]
PFX $ 0 mcmx [lc]
PFX $ 0 mcml x
PFX $ 0 mm [xlc]
PFX $ 0 mmx [lc]
PFX $ 0 mml x

SFX @ N 16 # numeri ordinari 1#2
SFX @ i esimo i
SFX @ i esima i
SFX @ i esimi i
SFX @ i esime i
SFX @ 0 simo e
SFX @ 0 sima e
SFX @ 0 simi e
SFX @ 0 sime e
SFX @ o esimo o
SFX @ o esima o
SFX @ o esimi o
SFX @ o esime o
SFX @ a esimo a
SFX @ a esima a
SFX @ a esimi a
SFX @ a esime a

SFX & N 56 # numeri ordinali 2#2
SFX & i unesimo i
SFX & i unesima i
SFX & i unesimi i
SFX & i unesime i
SFX & a unesimo a
SFX & a unesima a
SFX & a unesimi a
SFX & a unesime a
SFX & 0 unesimo [^ai]
SFX & 0 unesima [^ai]
SFX & 0 unesimi [^ai]
SFX & 0 unesime [^ai]
SFX & 0 duesimo .
SFX & 0 duesima .
SFX & 0 duesimi .
SFX & 0 duesime .
SFX & 0 treesimo .
SFX & 0 treesima .
SFX & 0 treesimi .
SFX & 0 treesime .
SFX & 0 quattresimo .
SFX & 0 quattresima .
SFX & 0 quattresimi .
SFX & 0 quattresime .
SFX & 0 cinquesimo .
SFX & 0 cinquesima .
SFX & 0 cinquesimi .
SFX & 0 cinquesime .
SFX & 0 seiesimo .
SFX & 0 seiesima .
SFX & 0 seiesimi .
SFX & 0 seiesime .
SFX & 0 settesimo .
SFX & 0 settesima .
SFX & 0 settesimi .
SFX & 0 settesime .
SFX & i ottesimo i
SFX & i ottesima i
SFX & i ottesimi i
SFX & i ottesime i
SFX & a ottesimo a
SFX & a ottesima a
SFX & a ottesimi a
SFX & a ottesime a
SFX & 0 ttesimo o
SFX & 0 ttesima o
SFX & 0 ttesimi o
SFX & 0 ttesime o
SFX & 0 ottesimo [^ai]
SFX & 0 ottesima [^ai]
SFX & 0 ottesimi [^ai]
SFX & 0 ottesime [^ai]
SFX & 0 novesimo .
SFX & 0 novesima .
SFX & 0 novesimi .
SFX & 0 novesime .
