motorola-external-hunspell/motorola/external/hunspell/dicts/it_IT/it_IT.dic
c/£$
cento/|!"@&()=
cinquanta/|@&)=
cinquecento/|!"@&(
d/£$
diciannove/@)
diciassette/@)
diciotto/@)
dodici/@)
duecento/|!"@&(
l/£$
m/£$
mille/|!@
novanta/|@&)=
novecento/|!"@&(
ottocento/Tq|!"@&(
quaranta/|@&)=
quattordici/@)
quattrocento/|!"@&(
quindici/@)
sedici/@)
seicento/|!"@&(
sessanta/|@&)=
settanta/|@&)=
settecento/|!"@&(
trecento/|!"@&(
tredici/@)
trenta/|@&)=
venti/|@&)=
x/£$
xx/£$
xxx/£$
